Colorado, session 2026A, HB1003.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-48.5-605, amend
(1)(b), (4)(a), (4)(b) introductory portion, (4)(b)(IV), and (4)(c) as follows:
24-48.5-605. Small business recovery and resiliency loan
program - creation - requirements - oversight.
(1) (b) The purpose of the loan program is to support the state's
recovery from the economic crisis caused by COVID-19 through leveraging
private investment to support Colorado small businesses recovering from
the crisis caused by COVID-19 by making loans, acquiring participation
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

interest in loans, leveraging private small business lending through the
Colorado credit reserve program, or other activities that accomplish the
same purpose. The loan program is also designed to support resiliency for
small businesses as new challenges emerge. The loan program may only
make loans directly if federal or state bank regulators prohibit the banking
industry from originating loans for the loan program.
(4) Any contract for the administration of a loan program must
include the following terms in order to receive money provided by the
office pursuant to subsection (3) of this section:
(a) Except for money contributed to the Colorado credit reserve, the
money from the small business recovery and resiliency fund provided by the
office in a single tranche may not be committed pursuant to a contract
relating to a loan program until money is committed pursuant to a contract
relating to a loan program from other sources at a ratio of at least four
dollars ONE DOLLAR from other sources for each one dollar provided by the
state from the small business recovery and resiliency fund. If a loan
program manager does not secure sufficient investments from other sources
to meet this requirement within the time allowed by a contract, the money
provided by the state must be returned to the small business recovery and
resiliency fund.
(b) Except for money contributed to the Colorado credit reserve,
once the money in a tranche is matched in accordance with subsection (4)(a)
of this section, it must be used to make loans or purchase participation
interest in loans for BUSINESSES AS DETERMINED BY THE OVERSIGHT BOARD,
INCLUDING working capital including AND the purchase of equipment. to
eligible borrowers, or other activities that accomplish the same purpose The
oversight board shall consult with lending industry leaders and
representatives of small businesses with regard to subsections (4)(b)(I) to
(4)(b)(VI) of this section. Each loan must be subject to the following terms:
(IV) Principal and interest payments may be deferred for up to one
year, as determined by the oversight board, with the unpaid interest being
capitalized. Deferrals must be limited to circumstances of hardship. created
by the COVID-19 pandemic or based on ongoing economic conditions
(c) (I) To ensure geographic equity, each tranche of loan funding
must be subject to an initial period of time in which a portion of the money
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1003

is allocated to each county on a basis proportional to the county's share of
small businesses relative to the state, the county's share of small business
employees relative to the state, the county's share of small business personal
property relative to the state, or other similar metrics as determined by the
oversight board, or based on a formula established under subsection
(4)(c)(IV) of this section. The money allocated to each county must be
reserved for applications from eligible borrowers located in that county for
the initial period of time. For the purposes of this subsection (4)(c), an
eligible borrower is considered to be located in the county in which it has
its principal place of business, as reflected in its most recent filing with the
secretary of state or subject to such other documentation as the oversight
board establishes. The oversight board shall determine the amount of time
in which the money in each tranche is subject to a geographic restriction
under this subsection (4)(c)(I) THE LOAN PROGRAM SHALL BE USED TO
FUND BUSINESSES ACROSS THE STATE OVER THE DURATION OF THE PROGRAM
AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 24-48.5-604 (8)(d), SHALL MAINTAIN
TARGETS AND SUPPORT BUSINESSES LOCATED IN RURAL COUNTIES AND
BUSINESSES OWNED BY WOMEN, MINORITIES, OR VETERANS. THE PROGRAM
SHALL TRACK THE DISTRIBUTION OF CAPITAL TO COUNTIES.
(II) Once the time period established by the oversight board under
subsection (4)(c)(I) of this section has passed, all money remaining in the
tranche is available to eligible borrowers on a statewide basis.
(III) For money contributed to the Colorado credit reserve, the
oversight board may waive the requirements of this subsection (4)(c) or
establish alternative geographic distribution requirements or targets.
(IV) For any tranche of loan funding, the oversight board may, in its
discretion, establish an alternative formula for the allocation of money to
counties for purposes of subsection (4)(c)(I) of this section that accounts for
how affected each county has been by the COVID-19 pandemic and its
impacts or based on ongoing economic conditions.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-48.5-608, add (2)(d)
as follows:
24-48.5-608. Small business recovery and resiliency fund -
repeal.
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1003

(2) (d) (I) ON JUNE 30, 2026, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL
TRANSFER FIVE MILLION DOLLARS FROM THE SMALL BUSINESS RECOVERY
AND RESILIENCY FUND TO THE COLORADO STARTUP LOAN PROGRAM FUND
ESTABLISHED IN SECTION 24-48.5-131 (9).
(II) THIS SUBSECTION (2)(d) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027.
SECTION 3. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1003

preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1003